Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1654.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1142.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1142.1. Minimum Salaries for Teachers.--* * *(a.1) For the school term 2026-2027 and each school term thereafter, a school district shall establish the same starting salary for teachers holding the same grade span State instructional certification in the same class and step.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718